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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULICBRAKEBOOSTERPOWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM
DTC C 1257 / 57 Power Supply Drive Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
After the ignition switch has been turned ON, open or short * Battery o
C1257/57 L . o » Power source circuit
circuit in circuit of power supply drive system inside ECU.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkbattery voltage.

OK:
Voltage: 10 - 14V

NG> Check and repair the charging system.

@

2 | Check voltage of the ECU IG power souce.

INCASEOFUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and pushthe hand -heldtester main switch ON.

(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Checkthe voltage condition output from the ECU displayed onthe hand -heldtester.
OK:

”Normal” is displayed.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULICBRAKEBOOSTERPOWER

SUPPLY SYSTEM
INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:
ON PREPARATION:
@ IG1 GND Remove ABS ECU with connectors still connected.
/ J GND| CHECK:
(@  Turn the ignition switch ON.
L M (b) Measure voltage betweenterminalsIG 1 and GND of ABS
ECU connector.
OK:
Voltage: 10 -14V
F04451
N CHECK:
;ND G2 anp| @ Turn the ignition switch ON.
‘/ (b) Measure voltage between terminals IG2 and GND of ABS
TnTaly ECU connector.
LD 1/ (O OK:

j)

F04453

o
)
)
NG\

Voltage: 10 - 14V

0K> Ignition switch OFF, check and replace ABS
ECU.

3 | Check continuity between terminal GND of ABS ECU connector and body

F04452

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM6 16E)

ground.
LOCK GND CHECK:
® / GND| Measureresistance betweenterminal GND of ABS ECU con-
AL AP LT nector and body ground.
[TTTTTT AL I yg
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 — r § p_AAYE

Resistance: 1 Q orless

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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4 Check ECU-IG fuse.
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PREPARATION:
Remove ECU-IG fuse from the driver’s side J/B.
CHECK:
Check continuity of ECU-IG fuse.
OK:
Continuity

components connected to ECU-IG fuse (See at-

NG Check for short circuit in all the harness and
tached wiring diagram).

Check for open circuit in harness and connector between ABS ECU and battery (See page IN-24
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